Illinois, session 104th, HB3163.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 8by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 9exempt from inspection and copying:10        (a) All information determined to be confidential 11    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 12    Development Act.13        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 14    library users with specific materials under the Library 15    Records Confidentiality Act.16        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 17    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 19    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 21    has received.22        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   HB3163 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   HB3163 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   HB3163 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 2    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   HB3163 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 26    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent   HB3163 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   HB3163 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB3163 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   HB3163 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 3    July 1, 2025. 4        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 6    Agency Licensing Act. 7        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 8    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 9    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 10    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 11    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 12    Act. 13        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 14    the School Safety Drill Act. 15        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 17        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 18    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 19    Act. 20        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2-3.196 of the School Code. 22        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 24    Power Agency Act. 25        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 26    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the   HB3163 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 2        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 3    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 4    Act. 5        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 6    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 7    Act. 8        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 9    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 10        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 12    Transmission Modernization Act. 13        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.15        (ttt) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 40 of the Reproductive Health Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 198-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 20102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 216-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 23103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 247-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 25eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 26103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)   HB3163 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    Section 10. The Reproductive Health Act is amended by 2adding Section 40 as follows: 3    (775 ILCS 55/40 new)4    Sec. 40. Health care professional privacy.5    (a) A health care professional who provides 6abortion-related care may submit to any governmental agency, 7person, business, or association a written request that the 8governmental agency, person, business, or association refrain 9from disclosing any personal information about the health care 10professional.11    A representative from the health care professional's 12employer may submit a written request on behalf of the health 13care professional, if: (i) the health care professional gives 14written consent to the representative; and (ii) the 15representative agrees to furnish a copy of that consent when a 16written request is made. The representative shall submit the 17written request directly to a governmental agency, person, 18business or association.19    A written request is valid if the health care 20professional, or representative of the health care 21professional's employer, sends a written request directly to a 22governmental agency, person, business, or association.23    (b) The written request shall specify:24        (1) what personal information of the health care   HB3163 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    professional shall be maintained private;2        (2) if a health care professional wishes to identify a 3    secondary residence as a home address, the designation of 4    such; and5        (3) the identity of any immediate family, and any 6    personal information of those persons that shall be 7    excluded to the extent that it could reasonably be 8    expected to reveal the personal information of the health 9    care professional.10    (c) A written request is valid until the health care 11professional provides the governmental agency, person, 12business, or association with written permission to release 13the personal information. Otherwise, a written request from a 14health care professional expires on death.15    (d) If a governmental agency receives a written request 16from a health care professional in accordance with subsections 17(a) and (b), the governmental agency shall not publicly post 18or display publicly available content that includes any 19personal information of the health care professional. After 20receipt of the request, the governmental agency shall remove 21any personal information of the health care professional from 22the publicly available content within 5 business days, and 23shall not publicly post or display the personal information 24unless the health care professional has given the governmental 25agency written permission to release the personal information 26as required under subsection (c). The personal information of   HB3163 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1the health care professional is exempt from the Freedom of 2Information Act unless the governmental agency receives 3consent from the health care professional to make the personal 4information available to the public.5    (e) If a governmental agency fails to comply with a 6written request under subsection (d), the health care 7professional may bring an action seeking injunctive or 8declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction.9    (f) If a person, business, or association receives a 10written request from a health care professional in accordance 11with subsections (a) and (b), the person, business, or 12association shall refrain from publicly posting or displaying 13on the Internet publicly available content that includes the 14personal information of a health care professional. After 15receipt of a written request, the person, business, or 16association: (i) has 72 hours to remove the personal 17information from the Internet; (ii) shall ensure that the 18personal information of the health care professional is not 19made available on any website or subsidiary website controlled 20by that person, business, or association; and (iii) shall not 21transfer the personal information of the health care 22professional to any other person, business, or association 23through any medium.24    (g) No person, business, or association shall solicit, 25sell, or trade on the Internet any personal information of the 26health care professional with the intent to post an imminent   HB3163 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1or serious threat to the health and safety of the health care 2professional or the health care professional's immediate 3family.4    (h) A health care professional whose personal information 5is made public as a result of a violation of subsection (f) or 6(g) may bring an action seeking injunctive or declaratory 7relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. A court shall 8award a prevailing health care professional costs and 9reasonable attorney's fees.10    (i) No governmental agency, person, business, or 11association shall be found to have violated any provision of 12this Section if the health care professional fails to submit a 13written request calling for the protection of the personal 14information of the health care professional.15    (j) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly and 16publicly post on the Internet the personal information of a 17health care professional or health care professional's 18immediate family if the person knows that publicly posting the 19personal information poses an imminent and serious threat to 20the health and safety of the health care professional or 21health care professional's immediate family, and the violation 22is a proximate cause of bodily injury or death of the health 23care professional or health care professional's immediate 24family member. A person who violates this subsection is guilty 25of a Class 3 felony.26    (k) It is not a violation of subsection (j) if an employee   HB3163 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1of a governmental agency publishes personal information, in 2good faith, on the website of the governmental agency in the 3ordinary course of carrying out public functions if the 4employee complied with the conditions of this Section.5    (l) This Section and any rules adopted to implement this 6Section shall be construed broadly to favor the protection of 7the personal information of a health care professional.8    (m) As used in this Section:9    "Governmental agency" means all agencies, authorities, 10boards, commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and 11any other bodies politic and corporate of this State created 12by the constitution or statute, whether in the executive, 13judicial, or legislative branch; all units and corporate 14outgrowths created by executive order of the Governor or any 15constitutional officer, by the Supreme Court, or by resolution 16of the General Assembly; or agencies, authorities, boards, 17commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and any other 18bodies politic and corporate of a unit of local government, or 19school district.20    "Home address" means a permanent residence of the health 21care professional and any secondary residences affirmatively 22identified by the health care professional.23    "Immediate family" means a spouse, child, parent, or any 24blood relative of the health care professional or the spouse 25of the health care representative who lives in the same 26residence.  HB3163 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 08069 JRC 18115 b1    "Personal information" means a home address, home 2telephone number, mobile telephone number, pager number, 3personal email address, social security number, federal tax 4identification number, checking and savings account numbers, 5credit card numbers, marital status, and identity of children 6under the age of 18.7    "Publicly available content" means any written, printed, 8or electronic document or record that provides information or 9that serves as a document or record maintained, controlled, or 10in the possession of a governmental agency that may be 11obtained by any person or entity, from the Internet, from a 12governmental agency upon request free of charge or for a fee, 13or in response to a request under the Freedom of Information 14Act.15    "Publicly post" or "publicly display" means to communicate 16to another or otherwise make available to the general public.17    "Written request" means written notice signed by a health 18care professional requesting a governmental agency, person, 19business, or association to refrain from posting or displaying 20publicly available content that includes the personal 21information of the health care professional.